Louisiana, session 2026, HB1006.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 966(B)(2) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 966. Motion for summary judgment; procedure
* * *
B. Unless extended by the court and agreed to by all of the parties, a motion
for summary judgment shall be filed, opposed, or replied to in accordance with the
following provisions:
* * *
(2) Except for any document provided for under pursuant to
Subsubparagraph (A)(4)(b) of this Article, any opposition to the motion and all
documents in support of the opposition shall be filed and served in accordance with
Article 1313(A)(4) not less than fifteen ten days prior to the hearing on the motion.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2351 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1006